Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 12D.1, subsection 2, paragraph k, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: k. âQualified education expensesâ means the same as âqualified higher education expensesâ as defined in section 529(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by Pub. L. No. 115-97 , and shall include elementary and secondary school expenses for tuition described in section 529(c)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, subject to the limitations imposed by section 529(e)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code. âQualified education expensesâ includes expenses for the participation in an apprenticeship program registered and certified with the United States secretary of labor under section 1 of the National Apprenticeship Act, 29 U.S.C. Â§50, and amounts paid as Senate File 2137, p. 2 principal or interest on any qualified education loan on behalf of a beneficiary or a sibling of the beneficiary, subject to the limitations imposed by section 529(c)(9)(B) and (C) of the Internal Revenue Code. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2137, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor